Hawaii, session 2025, SB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that soil health is a critical element of sustainable crop production, as soil can directly influence biological and microbial activity that supports agricultural systems.  In the agricultural sector, soil health and quality can be negatively impacted by certain practices, such as the excessive use of chemical fertilizers that deplete essential microbiological nutrients.  Soil degradation can be further exacerbated by soil compaction, poor aggregation, high pathogen pressure, and heavy metal contamination, which can lead to reduced crop yields, increased disease susceptibility, and greater reliance on intensive agricultural practices that can further harm the environment. To prevent soil degradation, algae-based fertilizers have been proven to protect soil while replenishing key nutrients needed for agricultural activities.  Microbial algae-based fertilizers are rich in organic compounds, nitrogen, phosphorous, potassium, and trace elements that improve soil aeration, increase water retention, suppress harmful pathogens, and boost overall agricultural fertility. Emerging research has demonstrated that specific types of microalgae and seaweeds offer promising solutions to improve soil health as a stimulant for nutrient cycling.  Additionally, microbial algae products do not contain synthetic chemicals, which can harm both natural physical environments and critical water resources.  The incorporation of microbial algae-based fertilizers is a sustainable and cost-effective solution for the State's agricultural industry. The legislature recognizes that the agricultural industry remains a critical state priority.  As the State seeks to increase its food resiliency and self-sufficiency while promoting local produce and agricultural products, ensuring the overall health of soil is imperative to achieve this goal.  Further, as the agricultural industry continues to innovate methods suited for the State's unique natural environment, recent developments, including microbial algae soil products, can provide low-risk opportunities to test new practices.  By testing alternative agricultural methods in farms statewide, the agricultural industry can continue to grow while ensuring the safety of local produce and products for consumption. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish the microbial algae soil products pilot program; and (2)  Establish the microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-A  Microbial algae soil products pilot program.  (a)  There is established the microbial algae soil products pilot program to be administered by the department of agriculture to introduce microbial algae on agricultural lands in the State to address agricultural soil health while improving nutrient cycling, reducing fertilizer dependency, and enhancing overall soil health. (b)  Farmers shall be eligible for participation in the microbial algae soil products pilot program if the farmer: (1)  Operates a small to medium-sized farm of not less than ten acres; provided that farmers operating larger farms may participate if the total farm size does not exceed one hundred acres; (2)  Has stable or moderate production rates among all crops produced on the farm; (3)  Experiences yield reduction, poor soil health or nutrient management, or excessive fertilizer use that impacts the overall quality of soil; (4)  Produces high-value crops or a diverse variety of crops; and (5)  Operates an organic farm. The department of agriculture may establish additional criteria for eligibility to participate in the microbial algae soil products pilot program. (c)  The department of agriculture shall collaborate with the college of tropical agriculture and human resources of the university of Hawaii and laboratories at the university of Hawaii engaged in the study of soil sciences.  The department of agriculture may collaborate with other departments, laboratories, or units at the university of Hawaii whose expertise is relevant to the microbial algae soil products pilot program. (d)  The department of agriculture may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement and administer the microbial algae soil products pilot program. (e)  The department of agriculture shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations for long-term application of microbial algae soil products to the State's agricultural sector, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. §141-B  Microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund.  There is established within the state treasury the microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund, to be administered by the department of agriculture, into which shall be deposited all moneys appropriated by the legislature to the special fund, including gifts, donations, grants, or other proceeds collected by the department for the pilot program.  Moneys in the special fund shall be used for the administration of the microbial algae soil products pilot program established pursuant to section 141-A." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund the sum of $1,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  Data collection and analysis of soil from participating farms; (2)  Soil testing, bacterial counts, water retention, and crop yielding from participating farms; (3)  Equipment, algae-based products, and farming supplies necessary to carry out the microbial algae soil products pilot program; (4)  Educational outreach, including materials and informational seminars to recruit prospective farmers to the microbial algae soil products pilot program and education for the broader community; and (5)  The establishment of full-time equivalent (      FTE) positions to effectuate the purposes of the microbial algae soil products pilot program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  The microbial algae soil products pilot program special fund established pursuant to section 141-B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be abolished and repealed on June 30, 2027, and any unencumbered remaining balances shall lapse to the general fund. SECTION 6. In codifying the new sections added by section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 7.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________